District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.07

Practitioners.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the offenses of insurance fraud in the first degree or the second degree shall be deemed a crime of moral turpitude for the purposes of professional or trade license.

(b)

The Commissioner, court, or prosecutor shall notify the appropriate licensing authority, and the person who is injured by the offense may notify the appropriate licensing authority of any conviction.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125g
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-273, § 2, 46 DCR 1132
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-254, § 2(b), 50 DCR 233
July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-144, § 2(e), 53 DCR 2838
1981 Ed., § 22-3825.7.
D.C. Law 14-254, in subsec. (b), struck “The court or prosecutor” and inserted “ The Commissioner, court, or prosecutor”, and deleted the second sentence which had read: “The Commissioner shall hold a disciplinary hearing to determine whether the license or certificate of authority of the convicted practitioner should be suspended or revoked.”
D.C. Law 16-144, in subsec. (a), substituted “offenses of insurance fraud in the first degree or the second degree” for “offense of insurance fraud in the first degree”.